Louisiana, session 2026, HB262.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:24.4(F)(1)(k) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§24.4. Louisiana Competency-Based Education Program; statewide standards for
required subjects; Louisiana Educational Assessment Program; parish or city
school board comprehensive pupil progression plans; waivers
* * *
F.(1)
* * *
(k) A student who successfully completes each Carnegie unit required for
high school graduation shall receive a high school diploma regardless of his
performance on any state-administered test.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1017 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 262